Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska33-111
County clerks; compiling transfers; fees.

County clerks for compiling the transfer from the record of their office shall receive for each transfer the sum of fifteen cents, or such other sum, not exceeding fifteen cents, as the county board and county clerk may agree upon, to be paid by the county.

Laws 1881, c. 41, § 1, p. 221;

R.S.1913, § 2436;

C.S.1922, § 2376;

C.S.1929, § 33-115;

R.S.1943, § 33-111.

In the absence of a contract between the county and the county clerk, the clerk is entitled to receive the statutory compensation for compiling a numerical index in a new county. Bastedo v. Boyd County, 57 Neb. 100, 77 N.W. 387 (1898).